South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3936.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 1, Chapter 3, Title 23 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 23-3-82. (A) There is created the Illegal Immigration Information Reward Fund within the South Carolina Law Enforcement Division (SLED). The fund is to be used exclusively to provide a five-hundred-dollar reward to each resident of this State that provides information to SLED's Illegal Immigration Enforcement Unit that leads to the apprehension and deportation of an illegal alien in South Carolina. SLED may adopt rules and promulgate regulations necessary to administer the reward program set forth in this section. (B) Each year, the General Assembly shall appropriate to the fund an amount necessary to pay the rewards allowed by this section. If sufficient funds are not appropriated to properly reward each resident meeting the requirements of this section, then SLED must place the informing individual on a priority list so that the resident receives the reward as soon as funds are available. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----